Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB639.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1511 of Title 15 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1511. Additional powers of certain public utility corporations.* * *(b.1) Single customer or prospective customer.--The powers conferred by subsection (a) may be exercised to condemn property necessary to provide service to a single customer or prospective customer of a public utility or railroad if the service provided is consistent with one or more of the principal purposes specified in subsection (a).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516171819